Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 5
COUNTY CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT TRUST FUNDS

30-26-501. Short title.

This part 5 shall be known and may be cited as the "County Capital Improvement Trust Fund Financing Act".

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 484, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-502. Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state to facilitate, assist, and promote the efforts of counties within this state in the planning, construction, acquisition, improvement, equipping, maintenance, and operation of public projects.

It is further the intent of the general assembly:

To authorize counties in this state to finance the acquisition, construction, and improvement of public improvements, buildings, and facilities which such counties are authorized to acquire, construct, and improve;

That this part 5 shall operate only as a grant of additional financing authority and shall not be construed to authorize counties to finance the acquisition, construction, or improvement of any public improvements, buildings, or facilities which such counties are not otherwise authorized to acquire, construct, or improve pursuant to applicable provisions of law;

To vest such counties with all powers that may be necessary to enable them to accomplish such financing purposes, including the power to issue negotiable revenue bonds, notes, and other obligations payable as set forth in this part 5, which powers in all respects shall be exercised for the benefit of the inhabitants of this state and for the promotion of their health, safety, and welfare.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 484, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-503. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of county commissioners or other governing body of any county.

"Bonds" means any revenue bonds or other obligations issued by a county pursuant to this part 5 but does not include general obligation bonds.

"County" means any county within this state.

"County capital improvement trust fund" means any one or more of the county capital improvement trust funds established pursuant to this part 5.

"Obligations" means notes, contracts, leases, and refunding obligations issued by a county pursuant to this part 5.

"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation or two or more or any combination of such entities.

"Political subdivision" means counties, special districts, water conservation districts, irrigation districts, municipal corporations, school districts, and all other political subdivisions of the state.

"Project" means any land, building, facility, or other improvement and all real or personal property, and any undivided or other interest in any of the foregoing, which is acquired, constructed, or improved or which is to be acquired, constructed, or improved by any county with the proceeds of any bonds issued by such county pursuant to this part 5 or with the principal of any county capital improvement trust fund expended by such county pursuant to this part 5, to the extent and only to the extent that such county is authorized to undertake any acquisition, construction, or improvement of such project under the laws of this state.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 485, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-26-504. Authority for establishment of county capital improvement trust funds.

Each county is hereby authorized to create a county capital improvement trust fund to be used for the purposes set forth in this part 5.

Moneys on deposit in any county capital improvement trust fund, and the proceeds from the investment of such funds, shall be used solely and exclusively for the purposes authorized by this part 5 and shall be inviolate for any other purpose.

Moneys on deposit in any county capital improvement trust fund shall be under the exclusive control of the board of the county for which such fund shall be established and shall be invested by the county treasurer of such county in accordance with the applicable provisions of laws concerning the investment of county funds. Earnings from the investment of moneys in any county capital improvement trust fund shall remain in such fund until applied in accordance with the provisions of this part 5. Any county may, to the extent otherwise authorized by law, appropriate funds of such county for deposit in such county capital improvement trust fund from any revenues, funds, or moneys of such county which are legally available for such purposes. Any moneys so appropriated by the board for deposit in any county capital improvement trust fund may be invested and reinvested as set forth in this part 5, and all such moneys on deposit in any county capital improvement trust fund shall be applied by the board only in accordance with the provisions of this part 5.

The board of each county for which a county capital improvement trust fund is created may:

Appropriate moneys on deposit in the county capital improvement trust fund of such county for any lawful county project, to the extent that such funds are not otherwise encumbered;

Allocate and distribute among any political subdivision within such county all or any portion of the county capital improvement trust fund of such county for the purpose of assisting any capital improvement to be undertaken by any such political subdivision, to the extent that such funds are not otherwise encumbered;

Pledge to the payment of the principal of, any premium on, and the interest on any bonds issued by such county pursuant to provisions of this part 5 all or any portion of the county capital improvement trust fund of such county; and

Do any and all things necessary to effect the purposes and exercise the powers authorized under the provisions of this part 5.

The board of each county for which a county capital improvement trust fund is established shall prepare guidelines consistent with the provisions of this part 5 for the allocation, distribution, pledging, investment, and expenditure of any moneys from time to time on deposit in the county capital improvement trust fund established for such county.

If any portion of this part 5 is held unconstitutional by a decision of the Colorado court of appeals, the Colorado supreme court, or any federal court, moneys on deposit in each county capital improvement trust fund shall be transferred to the county general fund; such transfer shall take effect on the day after such decision becomes final.

No moneys deposited in a capital improvement trust fund shall be appropriated, allocated, pledged, or distributed for a project if any statute, ordinance, resolution, or contract otherwise limits or restricts the use of such money for the particular type of project.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 485, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-505. Bonds - issuance - terms.

Any county, in addition to all other powers authorized by law, may, from time to time:

Issue revenue bonds, in such principal amounts as the county may deem necessary or appropriate, for the purpose of financing any project, including the payment, funding, or refunding of the principal of, any premium on, and the interest on any bonds issued by such county, whether the bonds or interest to be funded or refunded have or have not become due;

Establish or increase any reserve funds deemed necessary to secure payment of such bonds or interest thereon; and

Appropriate moneys necessary to pay for all other costs or expenses of the county incident to and necessary to carry out its authorized corporate and public purposes powers under this part 5.

Bonds issued pursuant to the authority of this part 5 shall constitute special obligations of the county issuing such bonds and shall be payable solely out of any county capital improvement trust fund moneys or the income from the investment thereof, to the extent that all or a portion of the same are made available for such purpose by the board of the county issuing such bonds. Bonds issued by any county pursuant to the authority of this part 5 may also be payable, in whole or in part, from any funds, revenues, income, or other moneys which are otherwise lawfully available for such purpose and which may be pledged by such county for the purpose of paying the principal of, any premium on, and the interest on its bonds.

Any such bonds may also be payable, in whole or in part, from the revenues and receipts derived from the project financed with such issue of bonds and may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant, subsidy, or contribution from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, from the state or any governmental agency thereof, or from any person unless otherwise prohibited by applicable state or federal law.

Whether or not such bonds are of such form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of the "Uniform Commercial Code", title 4, C.R.S., all such bonds are hereby made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of said title, subject only to the provisions contained in such bonds for registration.

Any such bonds shall be authorized by the board, may be issued in one or more series, and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates of interest, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable from such sources in such medium of payment at such place or places within or without the state, and be subject for such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as the board may provide.

Any such bonds may be sold at public or private sale at such price or prices and in such manner as the board shall determine.

Any such bonds may be issued under the provisions of this part 5 without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state and without any other proceeding or happening of any other conditions for other things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this part 5, including, in particular, all such bonds, so long as and to the extent that such bonds are payable exclusively from all or any portion of any county capital improvement trust fund created pursuant to this part 5, and such bonds may be issued without the requirement of any approval by the electorate of the county issuing such bonds.

Any such bonds shall not be in any way construed to be a debt or liability of the state or any political subdivision thereof and shall not create or constitute any indebtedness, liability, or obligation to the state or to any such political subdivision or be or constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision; but all such bonds, unless funded or refunded by bonds of such county, shall be payable solely from revenues or funds pledged or available for the payment as authorized in this part 5. Each bond issued by a county pursuant to this part 5 shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the county issuing such bonds is obligated to pay the principal of, any premium on, and the interest on such bonds only from revenues or funds of such county pledged for such payment, that neither the state nor any other political subdivision thereof is obligated to pay such principal of, any premium on, and the interest on such bonds, and that neither the faith and credit of the taxing power of the state nor any political subdivision thereof is pledged for the payment of the principal of, any premium on, and the interest on any such bonds.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this part 5 shall be payable solely from the revenues or funds provided or to be provided under the provisions of this part 5, and nothing in this part 5 shall be construed to authorize any county to incur any indebtedness on behalf of or payable by the state or any political subdivision thereof other than such county.

The board of a county may, in any resolution relating to the issuance of any such bonds and in order to secure the payment of such bonds, make such covenants as otherwise authorized by law to do or refrain from doing such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient, and desirable in order to better secure bonds, which covenants will, in the opinion of the board, tend to make such bonds more marketable.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 486, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-506. Pledge of revenues, funds, or other property lien.

Any pledge of revenues, moneys, funds, or other property made by a county pursuant to the provisions of this part 5 shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues, moneys, funds, or other property so pledged and thereafter received by such county shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the county, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Any resolution or any other instrument by which a pledge of revenues, moneys, or funds is created shall be filed or recorded with the county.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 488, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-507. Personal liability.

Neither the members of the board of a county nor any person executing bonds or notes issued pursuant to this part 5 shall be personally liable on any bonds of such county by reason of the issuance of such bonds.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 488, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-508. Bonds - exempt from taxation.

Any bonds issued under the provisions of this part 5, the transfer of any such bonds, and the income from such bonds shall be free from taxation by the state or any political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 488, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-509. Annual audit.

Each county for which a county capital improvement trust fund has been established shall prepare and submit, in accordance with the provisions of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., an annual audit report of its activities with respect to such fund for the preceding fiscal year.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 488, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-510. Bonds - eligible for investment.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this part 5 are hereby made securities in which all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest moneys, including capital, under the control of or belonging to such entities. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds is authorized by law.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 489, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1130, § 70, effective July 1.

30-26-511. Agreement of counties.

Any county is authorized to enter into agreements with the state or any of its agencies or departments, any of its political subdivisions, any agency or department of the United States, or any person with respect to any project in order to facilitate the financing, acquisition, and construction of such project and to promote the purposes of this part 5. Such agreements may be for a term covering the life of a project, for any other term, or for any indefinite period. Pursuant to any such agreement, counties or persons may obligate themselves to make payments in amounts which shall be sufficient to enable such counties or persons to pay their expenses and the interest and principal payments (whether at maturity or upon sinking fund redemption) for any bonds issued pursuant to this part 5, to maintain reasonable reserves for debt service, operation and maintenance, and renewals and replacements, and to meet the requirements of any rate covenant with respect to debt service coverage contained in any resolution, trust indenture, or other security instrument.

The obligations of a governmental agency or persons under an agreement with the county or arising out of the default by any other purchaser with respect to such an agreement shall not be construed to constitute debt of the governmental agency or persons. To the extent provided in agreements with the county, such obligations shall constitute special obligations of the governmental agency or persons and shall be payable solely from the revenues and other moneys derived by the governmental agency or persons.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 489, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-512. Effect on inconsistent acts and rules and regulations.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, in the event of any conflict or inconsistency between the provisions of this part 5 and any other statute pertaining to matters established or provided for in this part 5 or in any rules and regulations adopted under this part 5 or under any other statutes, to the extent of such conflict or inconsistency, the provisions of this part 5 and the rules and regulations adopted under this part 5 shall be enforced, and the provisions of any other statute or rules and regulations adopted under such statute shall have no force and effect.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 489, § 1, effective July 1.

30-26-513. Construction of this part 5.

This part 5 shall be liberally construed to effectuate the legislative intent and the purposes of this part 5 as the complete and independent authority for the performance of each and every act and thing authorized in this part 5. All the powers granted in this part 5 shall be broadly interpreted to effectuate such intent and purposes and shall not be interpreted as a limitation of such powers.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 489, § 1, effective July 1.